en: Sunflower honeys
de: Sonnenblumenhonige
fr: Miels de tournesol
hr: Suncokretov med
hu: Napraforgó mézek
it: Miele di girasole
lt: Medus iš saulėgrąžų žiedų
nl: Zonnebloemhoningen

en: Honeys from the United Kingdom
fr: Miels du Royaume-Uni
hr: Medovi iz Ujedinjenog Kraljevstva
lt: Medus iš Jungtinės Karalystės
nl: Honingen uit Groot-Britannië

fr: Miel de Pitcairn, Miel de l'île Pitcairn
nl: Pitcairnhoningen

en: Honeys from Yemen
fr: Miels du Yémen
hr: Medovi iz Jemena
lt: Medus iš Jemeno
nl: Honingen uit Yemen

en: Liquid honeys
de: flüßiger Honig, flüßige Honige
es: Mieles liquidas
fi: nestemäiset hunajat
fr: Miels liquides
hr: Tekući medovi
hu: Tiszta mézek
it: Miele liquido
lt: Skystas medus
nl: Vloeibare honingen
pt: Méis líquidos
sv: Flytande honung

en: Rosemary honeys, Rosemary honey
de: Rosmarin Honige, Rosmarin Honig
es: Mieles de romero
fi: Rosmariinihunajat, Rosmariinihunaja
fr: Miels de romarin, Miel de romarin
hr: Medovi od ružmarina
it: Miele di rosmarino
lt: Medus iš rozmarinų
nl: Rozemarijnhoningen

en: Fir honeys
fr: Miels de sapin
hr: Jelovi medovi
it: Miele di melata di abete
nl: Sparrenhoningen

fr: Miels de jujubier du Yémen
nl: Jujubehoningen uit Yemen

en: Eggs and their products
fr: Œufs et dérivés
nl: Eieren en afgeleide producten
zh: 鸡蛋及其制品

en: Scrambled egg, Egg scrambled with added fat, Scrambled eggs with added fat
fr: Oeufs brouillés, Oeuf brouillé avec matière grasse
hr: Umućeno jaje
ja: スクランブルエッグ
lt: Kiaušinienė

en: Poached eggs, Egg poached
fr: Oeuf poché
hr: Poširana jaja
ja: ポーチドエッグ
lt: virtų kiaušinių

en: Soft-boiled eggs, Egg soft-boiled
fr: Oeuf à la coque
hr: Meko kuhana jaja
ja: 半熟卵
lt: Silpnai virti kiaušiniai

en: Cooked egg yolk
fr: jaune d'oeuf cuit
hr: Kuhani žumanjak
lt: Keptas kiaušinio trynys

en: Fried egg, Egg fried without added fat
fr: Oeuf au plat, Oeuf au plat sans matière grasse

en: Egg preparations
fr: Préparations à base d'œufs, préparations à base d'oeufs

en: Omelettes
fr: Omelettes, Omelettes aux oeufs
hr: Omleti
ja: オムレツ
nl: Omeletten

en: Omelette with meat
fr: Omelette à la viande
hr: Omlet s mesom
lt: Omletai su mėsa

en: Omelettes with cheese
fr: Omelettes au fromage
hr: Omleti sa sirom
lt: Omletai su sūriu

en: Omelette with vegetables
fr: Omelette aux légumes
hr: Omlet s povrćem
lt: Omletai su daržovėmis

en: Herb omelette
fr: Omelette aux fines herbes
hr: Omlet od začinskog bilja
lt: Omletai su žolelėmis